Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-742
Arrest without warrant by officer or citizen; when.

The arrest of a person may be lawfully made also by any peace officer or a private person, without a warrant upon reasonable information that the accused stands charged in the courts of a state with a crime punishable by death or imprisonment for a term exceeding one year, but when so arrested the accused must be taken before a judge or magistrate with all practicable speed and complaint must be made against him under oath setting forth the ground for the arrest as in section 29-741; and thereafter his answer shall be heard as if he had been arrested on a warrant.

Laws 1963, c. 159, § 14, p. 563.